bg-BG: Покритие на възпоменателна монета: Античен финиш; Силно блестящо (BU); Оцветено; Подобрено нециркулирало; Позлатен финиш; Висок релеф; Матов пруф; Пруф; Обратен пруф; Сатенено покритие; Мостра (SP); Ултра висок релеф; Нециркулирало (UNC); Друго
nb: Overflatebehandling på minnemynt: Antikk overflate; Utsøkt usirkulert (BU); Fargelagt; Forbedret usirkulert; Forgylt / gullbelagt overflate; Høyt relieff; Matt proof; Proof; Omvendt proof; Satengoverflate; Prøvemynt (SP); Ultrahøyt relieff; Usirkulert (UNC); Annet
pt-BR: Acabamento de moeda comemorativa: Acabamento envelhecido; Flor de cunho (FC); Colorizado; Não circulada aprimorada; Banhado a ouro/dourado; Alto-relevo; Prova fosca; Prova; Prova reversa; Acabamento acetinado; Espécime (SP); Relevo ultra-alto; Não circulada (UNC); Outro
sl-SI: Končna obdelava spominskega kovanca: Antični premaz; Neobtočen visokega sijaja (BU); Obarvano; Izboljšano neobtočen; Pozlačeno; Visoki relief; Mat poliran profil; Poliran profil (Proof); Obrnjeni polirani profil (Reverse Proof); Satenast premaz; Vzorec (SP); Izjemno visoki relief; Neobtočen (UNC); Drugo
pt-PT: Acabamento da moeda comemorativa: Acabamento envelhecido; Não circulada brilhante (BU); Colorida; Não circulada melhorada; Acabamento folheado/banhado a ouro; Alto-relevo; Prova mate; Prova; Prova invertida; Acabamento acetinado; Espécime (SP); Ultra alto-relevo; Não circulada (UNC); Outro
en: Commemorative coin finish: Antique finish; Brilliant uncirculated (BU); Colorized; Enhanced uncirculated; Gilded/Gold-plated finish; High relief; Matte proof; Proof; Reverse proof; Satin finish; Specimen (SP); Ultra high relief; Uncirculated (UNC); Other
da: Erindringsmøntens finish: Antik finish; Brilliant ukirkuleret (BU); Farvelagt; Forbedret ukirkuleret; Forgyldt finish; Højrelief; Mat proof; Proof; Omvendt proof; Satinfinish; Prøvemønt (SP); Ekstra højrelief; Ukirkuleret (UNC); Andet
es: Acabado de monedas conmemorativas: Acabado antiguo; Sin circular brillante (BU); Coloreado; Sin circular mejorada; Acabado dorado/chapado en oro; Alto relieve; Prueba mate; Prueba; Prueba inversa; Acabado satinado; Espécimen (SP); Ultra alto relieve; Sin circular (UNC); Otro
fr: Finition des pièces commémoratives: Finition antique; Brillant universel (BU); Colorisé; Non circulé amélioré; Doré/Finition plaquée or; Haut relief; Flan bruni mat; Belle épreuve; Belle épreuve inversée; Finition satinée; Spécimen (SP); Ultra haut relief; Non circulé (UNC); Autre
hr-HR: Izgled prigodne kovanice: Antikna obrada; Visoki sjaj, necirkulirano (BU); U boji; Poboljšano necirkulirano; Pozlaćena obrada; Visoki reljef; Mat polirana ploča; Polirana ploča; Obrnuta polirana ploča; Satenska obrada; Uzorak (SP); Iznimno visoki reljef; Necirkulirano (UNC); Ostalo
tr: Hatıra para yüzeyi: Antika kaplama; Parlak çil (BU); Renklendirilmiş; Geliştirilmiş çil; Yaldızlı/Altın kaplama; Yüksek kabartma; Mat proof; Proof; Ters proof; Saten kaplama; Örnek (SP); Ultra yüksek kabartma; Çil (UNC); Diğer
el: Φινίρισμα αναμνηστικού νομίσματος.: Φινίρισμα αντίκας; Εξαιρετικά ακυκλοφόρητο (BU); Χρωματισμένο; Βελτιωμένο ακυκλοφόρητο; Επίχρυσο φινίρισμα; Υψηλό ανάγλυφο; Ματ proof; Proof; Αντίστροφο proof; Σατινέ φινίρισμα; Δοκίμιο (SP); Εξαιρετικά υψηλό ανάγλυφο; Ακυκλοφόρητο (UNC); Άλλο
sv: Jubileumsmyntyta: Antik finish; Briljant ocirkulerad (BU); Färglagd; Förbättrad ocirkulerad; Förgylld/Guldpläterad finish; Högrelief; Matt proof; Proof; Omvänd proof; Satinfinish; Specimen (SP); Ultrahög relief; Ocirkulerad (UNC); Övrigt
cs: Povrchová úprava pamětní mince: Starožitná úprava; Brilliant Uncirculated (BU); Kolorovaná; Enhanced Uncirculated; Pozlacená úprava; Vysoký reliéf; Matný proof; Proof; Reverse proof; Saténová úprava; Specimen (SP); Ultra vysoký reliéf; Uncirculated (UNC); Ostatní
ko: 기념주화 마감: 앤티크 마감; 완전 미사용(BU); 컬러 처리; 강화 미사용; 도금/금도금 마감; 하이 릴리프; 무광 프루프; 프루프; 리버스 프루프; 새틴 마감; 스페시먼(SP); 울트라 하이 릴리프; 미사용(UNC); 기타
hu: Emlékérme felülete: Antikolt felület; Verdefényes (BU); Színezett; Fokozottan verdefényes; Aranyozott felület; Magas domborművű; Matt proof; Proof; Fordított proof; Selyemfényű felület; Minta (SP); Ultra magas domborművű; Verdefényes (UNC); Egyéb
ja: 記念コイン仕上げ: アンティーク仕上げ; 完全未使用品 (BU); カラー; 特別未使用品; 金メッキ仕上げ; ハイリリーフ; マットプルーフ; プルーフ; リバースプルーフ; サテン仕上げ; スペシメン (SP); ウルトラハイリリーフ; 未使用品 (UNC); その他
de: Oberfläche der Gedenkmünze: Antik-Finish; Stempelglanz (BU); Koloriert; Enhanced Uncirculated; Vergoldet; Hochrelief; Mattierte Polierte Platte; Polierte Platte (Proof); Reverse Proof; Seidenmatt; Specimen (SP); Ultra-Hochrelief; Unzirkuliert (UNC); Sonstige
th: ลักษณะพื้นผิวของเหรียญที่ระลึก: ผิวรมดำ; ไม่ผ่านการใช้งานประกายรุ้ง (BU); ลงสี; ไม่ผ่านการใช้งานแบบพิเศษ; เคลือบทอง; นูนสูง; พรูฟแบบด้าน; พรูฟ; พรูฟกลับด้าน; ผิวซาติน; ตัวอย่าง (SP); นูนสูงพิเศษ; ไม่ผ่านการใช้งาน (UNC); อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Proginės monetos apdaila: Antikvarinė apdaila; Nepriekaištingos kokybės, nebuvusi apyvartoje (BU); Spalvinta; Patobulinta, nebuvusi apyvartoje; Auksuota apdaila; Aukštas reljefas; Matinė (Proof); Kolekcinė (Proof); Atvirkštinė kolekcinė (Reverse proof); Satininė apdaila; Pavyzdinė (SP); Ypač aukštas reljefas; Nebuvusi apyvartoje (UNC); Kita
ro-RO: Finisajul monedei comemorative: Finisaj antichizat; Necirculată, luciu de batere (BU); Colorată; Necirculată îmbunătățită; Finisaj aurit/placat cu aur; Relief înalt; Proof mat; Proof; Proof invers; Finisaj satinat; Specimen (SP); Relief ultra-înalt; Necirculată (UNC); Altele
vi: Lớp hoàn thiện bề mặt tiền xu kỷ niệm: Lớp hoàn thiện giả cổ; Mới tinh chưa lưu hành (BU); Tô màu; Mới tinh tăng cường; Mạ vàng; Chạm nổi cao; Tiền xu đúc mẫu mờ; Tiền xu đúc mẫu; Đúc mẫu ngược; Lớp hoàn thiện satin; Mẫu vật (SP); Chạm nổi cực cao; Chưa lưu hành (UNC); Khác
nl: Afwerking herdenkingsmunt: Antieke afwerking; Brilliant Uncirculated (BU); Ingekleurd; Verbeterd ongecirculeerd; Vergulde afwerking; Hoog reliëf; Matte proof; Proof; Reverse proof; Zijdeglans afwerking; Specimen (SP); Ultrahoog reliëf; Ongecirculeerd (UNC); Overige
ru: Отделка памятной монеты: Антик; Brilliant Uncirculated (BU); Цветная; Enhanced Uncirculated; Позолоченная; Высокий рельеф; Матовый Proof; Proof; Reverse Proof; Сатиновая; Specimen (SP); Ультравысокий рельеф; Uncirculated (UNC); Другое
pl: Wykończenie monety okolicznościowej: Antyczne; Brilliant uncirculated (BU); Kolorowane; Enhanced uncirculated; Pozłacane / powlekane złotem; Wysoki relief; Matowa lustrzanka; Lustrzanka; Odwrotna lustrzanka; Satynowe; Specimen (SP); Ultra wysoki relief; Stan menniczy (UNC); Inne
zh-TW: 紀念幣表面處理: 仿古處理; 亮面未流通 (BU); 彩色; 精製未流通; 鎏金/鍍金處理; 高浮雕; 霧面精鑄; 精鑄; 逆精鑄; 緞面處理; 樣幣 (SP); 超高浮雕; 未流通 (UNC); 其他
zh-CN: 纪念币表面处理: 仿古表面; 出厂状态未流通 (BU); 上色; 强化未流通; 镀金表面; 高浮雕; 哑光精制; 精制; 反向精制; 缎面; 样币 (SP); 超高浮雕; 未流通 (UNC); 其他
sk-SK: Úprava pamätnej mince: Antická úprava; Brilliant uncirculated (BU); Kolorované; Enhanced uncirculated; Pozlátená úprava; Vysoký reliéf; Matný proof; Proof; Reverzný proof; Saténová úprava; Specimen (SP); Ultra vysoký reliéf; Neobiehajúce (UNC); Iné
it: Finitura della moneta commemorativa: Finitura anticata; Fior di conio (BU); Colorata; Fior di conio migliorato; Finitura dorata/placcata in oro; Altorilievo; Fondo specchio opaco; Fondo specchio (Proof); Proof inverso; Finitura satinata; Specimen (SP); Altorilievo estremo; Non circolata (UNC); Altro
fi: Juhlarahan viimeistely: Antiikkiviimeistely; Brilliant uncirculated (BU); Väritetty; Parannettu leimaamaton; Kullattu viimeistely; Korkokuvio; Matta proof; Proof; Käänteinen proof; Satiiniviimeistely; Näyte (SP); Erittäin korkea korkokuvio; Leimaamaton (UNC); Muu